Arkansas, session 2025, HB1543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:


SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 76 is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 9 - Workforce Experience Opportunities Act of 2025

20-76-901. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Workforce
Experience Opportunities Act of 2025".

20-76-902. Legislative purpose.
The purpose of this subchapter is to increase employment, income, and
self-sufficiency among families by giving recipients of Supplemental
Nutrition Assistance Program benefits more opportunities to comply with work
requirements by volunteering at any public entity that receives state
funding.

20-76-903. Definitions.
*CRH115*
04-03-2025 17:16:05 CRH115

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1543
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Accept and accommodate” means allowing an individual to
physically enter and remain in the portion of a physical address open to the
public when an employee is present for no less than four (4) hours per day
and providing access to a bathroom;
(2) “State-funded entity” means:
(A) An agency, a sub-agency, a political subdivision of
the state, or an office of the state with a physical address at which
individuals are employed indoors at least part-time; or
(B) A municipal entity or office of a municipal entity
that accepts any amount of state funding in a given calendar year with a
physical address at which individuals are employed indoors at least part-
time; and
(3) “Work requirement volunteer” means a state resident who:
(A) Is required to comply with the employment and training
program requirement required in § 20-76-803 as a condition of eligibility for
the Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program; and
(B) Does not qualify for an exemption under 7 U.S.C. §
2015(d)(2), as it existed on January 1, 2025.

20-76-904. Requirements of state-funded entities.
(a) A state-funded entity shall accept and accommodate a work
requirement volunteer who presents documentation of his or her work
requirement and photographic identification.
(b) A state-funded entity that accepts a work requirement volunteer
shall:
(1) Provide timely documentation to the agency responsible for
monitoring the work requirement volunteer’s compliance with a work
requirement that accurately certifies:
(A) The work requirement volunteer’s physical presence;
and
(B) Any additional descriptions or information required by
the responsible agency; and
(2) Allow the work requirement volunteer to monitor the
operations of the state-funded entity to the extent the monitoring does not
interfere with:
04-03-2025 17:16:05 CRH115

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1543
(A) Essential functions: or
(B) The health and safety of employees or the public.
(c) In accepting and accommodating a work requirement volunteer, a
state-funded entity:
(1) May allow or require a work requirement volunteer to
participate in:
(A) An activity for which no experience or education is
required; or
(B) An activity for which a work requirement volunteer is
qualified, including without limitation an activity that occurs in a place
other than the state-funded entity’s physical address;
(2) May prohibit a work requirement volunteer from engaging in
an activity on the premises of the state-funded entity other than providing
himself or herself basic human necessities of relief when the work
requirement volunteer is not otherwise engaged; and
(3) Shall not allow the acceptance and accommodation of a work
requirement volunteer to negatively interfere with essential operations of
the state-funded entity.
(d) A state-funded entity is exempt from this subchapter if the
presence of a work requirement volunteer anywhere on the premises will
inevitably or inherently interfere with the essential operations of the
state-funded entity or negatively impact the health and safety of the
community served by the state-funded entity.

20-76-905. Liability.
(a) Except in a case of reckless conduct or intentional, willful, or
wanton misconduct, a state-funded entity or employee of a state-funded entity
is not liable for an injury, including without limitation economic and
noneconomic damages or death:
(1) Arising from the conduct of a work requirement volunteer; or
(2) Experienced by a work requirement volunteer either at a
physical location or during an activity associated with the state-funded
entity.
(b) A work requirement volunteer is not eligible for workers
compensation benefits under § 11-9-101 et seq.
(c)(1) A defense under this section is in addition to any other
04-03-2025 17:16:05 CRH115

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 HB1543
defense, immunity, or limitation of liability provided by law.
(2) This section does not:
(A) Constitute a waiver of sovereign immunity of the state
or governmental immunity of any political subdivision; or
(B) Modify the defenses or duties of a work requirement
volunteer for conduct associated with his or her acceptance and accommodation
by a state-funded entity.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Effective date.
This subchapter shall be effective on and after January 1, 2026.

/s/Underwood
























04-03-2025 17:16:05 CRH115